Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-315 Violation of expense limitation.
(a) The officers and directors of an insurer violating section 431:4-314 shall
be jointly and severally liable to the insurer for any excess of expenses
incurred.

(b) For failure or refusal of the insurer to
exercise reasonable diligence in enforcing such liability, the commissioner
may:

(1) Prosecute action thereon for the benefit of the
insurer; and

(2) Revoke the insurer's certificate of authority. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next